Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 348, O.S.L.
2022 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2021), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2021. A. There is hereby established a fund within the
State Treasury to be known as the Oklahoma Disaster Mitigation and
Recovery Matching Fund, to be administered by the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce. The fund shall be a continuing fund not
subject to fiscal year limitations. Within the Oklahoma Disaster
Mitigation and Recovery Matching Fund there shall be established
separate accounts as prescribed by Section 4 2022 of this act title
into which shall be deposited such funds as may be provided by law.
B. One of nine accounts shall be available to each entity
described in subsection A of Section 4 2022 of this act title.
C. One account shall be divided equally into two subaccounts.
One of the two subaccounts shall be available to each of the
entities described by subsection B of Section 4 2022 of this act

title for distribution to any city or town within the respective
jurisdiction of the entity or for the benefit of an unincorporated
area.
D. No funds deposited into one account or subaccount shall be
transferred to any other account The Oklahoma Department of Commerce
may deposit funds in any account or subaccount as needed, in any
amount, up to and including the full amount of the available funds
in order to pay for eligible activities at any time. The Oklahoma
Department of Commerce may exercise discretion to determine the
appropriate amount of funds needed to support eligible activities.
No entity may access any more than one account per fiscal year and
the total expenditure from any one account for each fiscal year may
not exceed the amount of funds available to each account as may be
provided by law.
E. No monies in the Oklahoma Disaster Mitigation and Recovery
Matching Fund shall be used for the payment of administrative
expenses, salaries, or any other continuing obligation of the
Oklahoma Department of Commerce.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2796 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2796 Page 3